Missouri, session 2026, SB1636.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 191.658, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
191.633 and 191.658, to read as follows:
191.633. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Exposure", any inhalation, ingestion, or contact
that may cause transmission of an infectious disease;
(2) "First responder", any:
(a) Law enforcement officer;
(b) Staff member of a jail or correctional center, as
defined in section 217.010;
(c) Paid or volunteer firefighter; or
(d) Emergency medical responder, emergency medical
technician, or paramedic, as those terms are defined in
section 190.100;
(3) "Health care facility", any facility, as the term
"facility" is defined in section 376.1350;
(4) "Health care professional", the same meaning given
to the term in section 376.1350;

SB 1636 2
(5) "Health care service", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;
(6) "Health care worker", any health care professional
or other individual who provides or assists in the provision
of health care services.
2. (1) Any health care facility that becomes aware
that a health care worker or law enforcement officer has
sustained an exposure to an infectious disease described in
subsection 3 of this section in the course of the worker's
or officer's duties shall notify the health care worker or
law enforcement officer of the exposure as soon as
practicable but no later than forty-eight hours after
becoming aware of the exposure. The notification shall
identify the particular infectious disease to which the
health care worker or law enforcement officer was exposed.
(2) Any first responder who has transported an
individual to a health care facility or had contact with an
individual during transport of the individual to a health
care facility or as a result of the event or circumstance
that required the transport may submit a request to the
health care facility for information on whether the
individual tests positive for any infectious disease
described in subsection 3 of this section during the
individual's course of admission or treatment at the health
care facility following the transport. The health care
facility shall provide notification of any exposure in the
manner required under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
3. Notification shall be required under subsection 2
of this section for exposure to any of the following
infectious diseases:
(1) Anthrax (Bacillus anthracis) if classified as
cutaneous;

SB 1636 3
(2) COVID-19 (SARS-CoV-2);
(3) Diphtheria (Corynebacterium diphtheriae);
(4) Hepatitis B (HBV);
(5) Hepatitis C (HCV);
(6) Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV);
(7) Measles (rubeola virus);
(8) Meningococcal disease (Neisseria meningitidis);
(9) Mumps (mumps virus);
(10) Novel influenza A viruses as defined by the
Council of State and Territorial Epidemiologists (CSTE);
(11) Pertussis (Bordetella pertussis);
(12) Pneumonic plague (Yersinia pestis);
(13) Rabies (rabies virus);
(14) Rubella, also known as German measles (rubella
virus);
(15) Severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS-CoV);
(16) Tuberculosis (Mycobacterium tuberculosis) if
classified as an infectious pulmonary or laryngeal disease
or an extrapulmonary disease with a draining lesion;
(17) Vaccinia (vaccinia virus);
(18) Varicella disease (varicella-zoster virus) if
classified as chickenpox or disseminated zoster; and
(19) Viral hemorrhagic fevers (Lassa, Marburg, Ebola,
Crimean-Congo, and other viruses).
4. The requirements of this section shall be in
addition to, and not in lieu of, the requirements of
sections 191.631 and 191.658.
191.658. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Disclose", to disclose, release, transfer,
disseminate or otherwise communicate all or any part of any

SB 1636 4
record orally, in writing or by electronic means to any
person or entity;
(2) "Health care practitioner", any licensed
physician, nurse practitioner or physician's assistant;
(3) "HIV", the human immunodeficiency virus that
causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome;
(4) "HIV infection", the pathological state of the
human body in response to HIV;
(5) "Medically significant exposure", a puncture
through or laceration of the skin, or contact of mucous
membrane or nonintact skin with blood, tissue, wound exudate
or other body fluids, including semen, vaginal secretions,
cerebrospinal fluid, synovial fluid, pleural fluid,
peritoneal fluid, pericardial fluid, amniotic fluid or any
body fluid containing visible blood, or contact of intact
skin with any such body fluids when the duration of contact
is prolonged or involves an extensive area of skin;
(6) "Person", private individuals, private or public
bodies politic, and corporations, partnerships, trusts, and
unincorporated associations and their officers, directors,
agents or employees;
(7) "Source individual", the person who is the source
of the blood or other body fluids to which medically
significant exposure occurred.
2. A health care practitioner providing medical
treatment for a health care worker or law enforcement
officer because of a medically significant exposure to blood
or other body fluids that occurred in the course of the
worker's or officer's employment may request from the
department of health and senior services information
regarding the HIV infection status of the source
individual. The department of health and senior services

SB 1636 5
may disclose to the health care practitioner the HIV
infection status of the source individual if such
information is on file with the department.
3. The health care practitioner shall disclose the HIV
infection status of the source individual to the exposed
health care worker or law enforcement officer if, in the
professional judgment of the health care practitioner, such
disclosure is necessary to assure adherence to a prescribed
treatment regimen or is required under section 191.633.
4. No person to whom information about an individual's
HIV infection has been disclosed pursuant to this section
shall further disclose such results.
5. Any person who knowingly releases information in
violation of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
✓